Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 17
PETROLEUM PIPELINES

Sec.

Cross references.

- Eminent domain for petroleum pipelines,

§

22-3-80

.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Petroleum Pipeline Eminent Domain Permit Procedures, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-23.

12-17-1. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources.

"Director" means the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Division" means the Environmental Protection Division within the Department of Natural Resources.

"Existing petroleum pipeline" means a petroleum pipeline constructed and in use prior to January 1, 2016.

"Expansion" means a modification to an existing petroleum pipeline within the existing easement or right of way that increases the supply of petroleum by:

Increasing the diameter of an existing petroleum pipeline; or

Constructing a parallel petroleum pipeline.

"Extension" means a modification to an existing petroleum pipeline that increases the length or footprint of the existing petroleum pipeline by a distance greater than one linear mile.

"Maintenance" means:

The care or upkeep of an existing petroleum pipeline and its appurtenances;

The replacement of an existing petroleum pipeline within the same easement or right of way; or

The relocation of an existing petroleum pipeline for repair within one linear mile of the existing petroleum pipeline's alignment.

"New petroleum pipeline" means a petroleum pipeline that was not constructed and in use prior to January 1, 2016. The term "new petroleum pipeline" shall not include an expansion, an extension, or any maintenance.

"Parallel petroleum pipeline" means a petroleum pipeline that runs side by side to an existing petroleum pipeline.

"Petroleum pipeline" means a fixed conduit constructed to transport petroleum or petroleum products in or through this state.

"Petroleum pipeline company" means a corporation organized under the laws of this state or which is organized under the laws of another state and is authorized to do business in this state and which is specifically authorized by its charter or articles of incorporation to construct and operate petroleum pipelines for the transportation of petroleum and petroleum products.

(Code 1981, §

12-17-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 744, § 1/HB 413.)

12-17-2. Permit required.

On or after July 1, 2017, any construction of a new petroleum pipeline or an extension in this state shall require a permit from the director as provided in this chapter. No construction activity on any portion of a new petroleum pipeline or any extension shall occur unless and until such permit is obtained. Such permit shall be required without regard to whether the petroleum pipeline company intends to exercise any power of eminent domain pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 3 of Title 22 and shall be in addition to any other permits or authorization required under this title or any other provision of state or federal law.

(Code 1981, §

12-17-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 744, § 1/HB 413.)

12-17-3. Permit application requirements; notice.

Any application to the division for a permit under this chapter shall contain, at a minimum, the following:

Siting information, including, but not limited to, a map showing the proposed location of the route of the new petroleum pipeline or of the extension;

Information obtained from a cultural resource assessment conducted along the proposed route of the new petroleum pipeline or of the extension;

Information as to geological and hydrologic features along the proposed route of the new petroleum pipeline or of the extension;

Information on the presence of threatened and endangered species along the proposed route of the new petroleum pipeline or of the extension;

Environmental information described in 40 C.F.R. Sections 1502.12 through 1502.18 as such provisions existed on January 1, 2017, to the extent required by rules and regulations of the board;

Evidence of financial responsibility by the petroleum pipeline company; and

Any other information that the board may require by rules and regulations.

Within ten days of applying for a permit, the applicant shall provide:

Public notice in the legal organ of each county through which the proposed route of the new petroleum pipeline or of the extension is to be located; and

Written notice of the filing of an application under this Code section to all landowners whose property is located within 1,000 feet of the proposed route of the new petroleum pipeline or of the extension. Such notice shall be delivered to each landowner and contain the following language in boldface type:

"YOUR PROPERTY IS LOCATED WITHIN 1,000 FEET OF A PROPOSED PETROLEUM PIPELINE FOR WHICH AN APPLICATION FOR A PERMIT HAS BEEN FILED PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 17 OF TITLE 12 OF THE OFFICIAL CODE OF GEORGIA ANNOTATED. SAID CHAPTER ALONG WITH ARTICLE 4 OF CHAPTER 3 OF TITLE 22 OF THE OFFICIAL CODE OF GEORGIA ANNOTATED PROVIDE SPECIFIC REQUIREMENTS WHICH MUST BE FOLLOWED BY PETROLEUM PIPELINE COMPANIES BEFORE THEY MAY BUILD A NEW PETROLEUM PIPELINE OR MODIFY AN EXISTING PETROLEUM PIPELINE. THESE PROVISIONS OF THE OFFICIAL CODE OF GEORGIA ANNOTATED ALSO PROVIDE SPECIFIC RIGHTS FOR YOUR PROTECTION. YOU SHOULD FAMILIARIZE YOURSELF WITH THOSE REQUIREMENTS AND YOUR RIGHTS."

(Code 1981, §

12-17-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 744, § 1/HB 413.)

12-17-4. Considerations in permitting.

In making the decision as to whether to grant any permits required by this chapter, the director shall determine whether the portion of the petroleum pipeline for which the permit is sought is consistent with and not an undue hazard to the environment and natural resources of this state after consideration of the following factors:

The information required to be contained in the petroleum pipeline company's application under Code Section 12-17-3;

The direct environmental impacts of the proposed new petroleum pipeline or the proposed extension;

Alternative alignments to the proposed new petroleum pipeline or the proposed extension;

Public comment; and

Such other factors that the director deems reasonable and applicable or that the board by rules and regulations has established in order to protect the best interests of this state, its citizens, and its natural resources.

The applicant shall bear the burden of proof to demonstrate that the director should issue a permit as provided under this chapter.

The director's decision shall be based on the record before the director, which shall include, but not be limited to, the applicant's submissions, written comments submitted to the director, and research the director may conduct in analyzing the application.

(Code 1981, §

12-17-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 744, § 1/HB 413.)

12-17-5. Aggrieved or adversely affected defined; administrative review.

As used in this Code section, the term "aggrieved or adversely affected" means a challenged action has caused or will cause persons injury in fact and where the injury is to an interest within the zone of interests to be protected or regulated by the provisions of this chapter that the director is empowered to administer and enforce.

Any person who is aggrieved or adversely affected by a decision or action of the director under this chapter shall, upon filing a petition within 30 days after the issuance of such order or taking of such action, have a right to a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the board. The hearing before the administrative law judge shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act." The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final decision of the director, and any party to the hearing, including the department, shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act."

In the event the director asserts in response to the petition before the administrative law judge that the petitioner is not aggrieved or adversely affected, the administrative law judge shall take evidence and hear arguments on this issue and thereafter make a ruling on same before continuing with the hearing. The burden of going forward with evidence on this issue shall rest with the petitioner.

(Code 1981, §

12-17-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 744, § 1/HB 413.)

12-17-6. Regulations for enforcement.

No later than July 1, 2018, the board shall, pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act," promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary and reasonable for purposes of enforcement of this chapter, which shall include, but may not be limited to:

The submission of a permit application and provisions for the application review process, not to exceed 150 days in length;

Provisions for a nonrefundable application fee which shall be sufficient to defray the administrative costs of review of the application by the division;

Reasonable public notice of the filing of permit applications to any landowner who, after reasonable efforts, cannot personally be given the notice required in subsection (b) of Code Section 12-17-3;

Provisions for public meetings to be held prior to any action on any permits; and

Evidence of financial responsibility as required by paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of Code Section 12-17-3.

No permit shall be granted by the division prior to the promulgation of rules and regulations as provided for in this Code section; provided, however, that once such rules and regulations have been promulgated and applications are accepted for filing, if any application is not approved or is denied within 150 days of the date such application is filed with the division under Code Section

12-17-3

, the application shall be deemed to be approved by operation of law.

(Code 1981, §

12-17-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 744, § 1/HB 413.)